Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1136.
do enact as follows:SB1136,15Section 1. 40.51 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1136,2,4640.51 (8) Every health care coverage plan offered by the state under sub. (6) 1shall comply with ss. 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 2632.729, 632.746 (1) to (8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 3632.85, 632.851, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (3) to (6), 632.885, 4632.89, 632.895 (5m) and (8) to (17), and 632.896.SB1136,25Section 2. 40.51 (8m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1136,2,9640.51 (8m) Every health care coverage plan offered by the group insurance 7board under sub. (7) shall comply with ss. 631.95, 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (1) to 8(8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 632.85, 632.851, 632.853, 9632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.885, 632.89, and 632.895 (11) to (17).SB1136,310Section 3. 66.0137 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1136,2,171166.0137 (4) Self-insured health plans. If a city, including a 1st class city, 12or a village provides health care benefits under its home rule power, or if a town 13provides health care benefits, to its officers and employees on a self-insured basis, 14the self-insured plan shall comply with ss. 49.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 15632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and (b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.85, 16632.851, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 17632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).SB1136,418Section 4. 120.13 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1136,2,2219120.13 (2) (g) Every self-insured plan under par. (b) shall comply with ss. 2049.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and 21(b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.85, 632.851, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 22632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).SB1136,523Section 5. 185.983 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1136,3,724185.983 (1) (intro.) Every voluntary nonprofit health care plan operated by a 1cooperative association organized under s. 185.981 shall be exempt from chs. 600 to 2646, with the exception of ss. 601.04, 601.13, 601.31, 601.41, 601.42, 601.43, 601.44, 3601.45, 611.26, 611.67, 619.04, 623.11, 623.12, 628.34 (10), 631.17, 631.89, 631.93, 4631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.745 to 632.749, 632.775, 632.79, 632.795, 5632.798, 632.85, 632.851, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (2) to (6), 6632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (5) and (8) to (17), 632.896, and 632.897 (10) and chs. 609, 7620, 630, 635, 645, and 646, but the sponsoring association shall:SB1136,68Section 6. 609.823 of the statutes is created to read:SB1136,3,119609.823 Prior authorization for treatment of severe misalignment or 10malocclusion of teeth. Limited service health organizations, preferred provider 11plans, and defined network plans are subject to s. 632.851.SB1136,712Section 7. 632.851 of the statutes is created to read:SB1136,3,1413632.851 Prior authorization for treatment of severe misalignment or 14malocclusion of teeth. (1) In this section:SB1136,3,1515(a) “Disability insurance policy” has the meaning given in s. 632.895 (1) (a).SB1136,3,1616(b) “Self-insured health plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.85 (1) (c).SB1136,3,2017(2) No disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan that provides 18coverage for dental and related services may solely rely upon the Salzmann 19Evaluation Index in making prior authorization decisions for the coverage of any 20treatment of severe misalignment or malocclusion of teeth.SB1136,821Section 8. Initial applicability.SB1136,3,2422(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 23act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 24subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).SB1136,4,51(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 2agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 3policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 4on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 5modified, or renewed, whichever is later.SB1136,96Section 9. Effective date.SB1136,4,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 8publication.SB1136,4,99